Indiana, session 2026, HB1263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-1.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. "Accessory food", for purposes of
IC 12-14-30-9.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-14-30-9.5(a).
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-77.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 77.3. "Energy drink", for purposes of
IC 12-14-30-9.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-14-30-9.5(b).
SECTION 3. IC 12-7-2-179.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 179.6. "Soft drink", for purposes
of IC 12-14-30-9.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-14-30-9.5(c).
SECTION 4. IC 12-7-2-189.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 189.6. "Sweetened beverage", for
purposes of IC 12-14-30-9.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 12-14-30-9.5(d).
2026 IN 1263—LS 6863/DI 148


SECTION 5. IC 12-14-30-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) As used in this section,
"accessory food":
(1) means accessory food items excluded from the definition
of "staple food" under 7 CFR 271.2; and
(2) includes the following:
(A) An energy drink.
(B) A sweetened beverage.
(C) A soft drink.
(D) Corn or potato chips.
(E) Prepared desserts, including:
(i) cookies;
(ii) candy;
(iii) ice cream;
(iv) cakes; and
(v) pies.
(b) As used in this section, "energy drink" means a beverage
that:
(1) contains at least sixty-five (65) milligrams of caffeine per
eight (8) fluid ounces; and
(2) is advertised or marketed as being specifically designed to
provide metabolic stimulation or an increase to the
consumer's mental or physical energy.
(c) As used in this section, "soft drink" means a carbonated
beverage to which sugar or an artificial sweetener has been added.
(d) As used in this section, "sweetened beverage" means a
nonalcoholic beverage:
(1) to which a natural or artificial sweetener is added; and
(2) that is sold for human consumption;
including a soft drink and other flavored beverages.
(e) The following apply with regards to SNAP benefits:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (f), a SNAP recipient may
not use SNAP benefits to purchase an accessory food.
(2) A SNAP recipient may use SNAP benefits to purchase hot
prepared chicken that is not fried or breaded, such as
rotisserie chicken or grilled chicken fingers.
(f) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) A milk product or a product, other than a soft drink or
energy drink, containing milk or milk protein.
(2) A milk substitute, including soy milk, rice milk, or almond
milk.
2026 IN 1263—LS 6863/DI 148


(3) A beverage, other than a soft drink or energy drink, in
which the only added sweetener does not add calories to the
beverage.
(4) A beverage that is:
(A) intended by the manufacturer for consumption by an
infant; and
(B) commonly referred to as infant formula.
(5) A beverage, other than a soft drink or energy drink,
intended by the manufacturer for use for weight reduction.
(6) A carbonated beverage to which no sugar or artificial
sweetener has been added.
(7) A fruit or vegetable juice, other than a soft drink or energy
drink, to which no sugar or artificial sweetener has been
added.
(8) A beverage or other product, other than a soft drink or
energy drink, intended for use as recommended by a health
care professional.
(9) A beverage or other product, other than a soft drink or
energy drink, that contains plant protein sources.
(10) A product, other than a soft drink or energy drink, that:
(A) is fortified with a vitamin or mineral; and
(B) contains a source of protein.
(g) If the office of the secretary determines that a waiver or
authorization by a federal agency is needed to implement this
section, the office:
(1) shall, not later than July 1, 2027, request the necessary
waiver or authorization; and
(2) may delay implementation of this section until the waiver
or authorization is granted.
SECTION 6. IC 16-30-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The state
department shall carry out health planning and resources development
responsibilities and functions within Indiana. The state department
shall do the following in the state department's planning activities:
(1) Promote health and wellness activities.
(2) Encourage the prevention of disease.
(3) Encourage innovations in the financing and delivery systems
for health services.
(4) Foster competition.
(5) Consider the accessibility and quality of health care services.
(b) The state department shall include promotion of healthy
eating as part of the state department's promotion of health and
2026 IN 1263—LS 6863/DI 148


wellness activities under subsection (a)(1), including by developing
and making available materials that provide guidance on
purchasing and preparing healthy foods on a limited budget.
2026 IN 1263—LS 6863/DI 148